Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-531
Inclusion; procedure.

The proceedings for the inclusion referred to in section 35-530 may be initiated by (1) the presentation to the county clerk of a petition signed by sixty percent or more of the registered voters who are residing within the boundaries of the territory to be included stating the desires and purposes of such petitioners or (2) adoption by a majority vote of a joint resolution or ordinance by the board of directors of the district and the city council or village board. The petition or joint resolution or ordinance shall contain a description of the boundaries of the territory proposed to be included and it shall be accompanied by a map or plat and a deposit for publications costs.

Laws 1978, LB 907, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 21.